Missouri, session 2026, HB2740.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 173, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 173.690, to read as follows:
173.690. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Genetic disease", any disease, disorder, or condition caused in whole or in
part by genetic variation, mutation, or inherited genetic traits;
(2) "Pediatric disease", any disease, disorder, or condition that primarily affects
individuals under eighteen years of age;
(3) "Rare pediatric disease", a life-threatening or chronically debilitating disease
that affects fewer than two hundred thousand individuals under eighteen years of age in
the United States.
2. There is hereby established within the department of higher education and
workforce development the "Pediatric Disease Task Force".
3. The task force shall consist of the following members:
(1) The director of the department of higher education and workforce
development or his or her designee;
(2) The director of the department of health and senior services or his or her
designee;
(3) Four members shall be from the general assembly composed of the following:
(a) The president pro tempore of the senate shall appoint two members of the
senate of whom not more than one shall be of the same party; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2740 2
(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint two members of the
house of representatives of whom not more than one shall be of the same party; and
(c) The legislative members shall serve on the task force until such time as they
resign, are no longer members of the general assembly, or are replaced by new
appointments; and
(4) Eight members to be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent
of the senate, composed of the following:
(a) Two members who represent public universities and who have expertise in
pediatric diseases, with at least one member who represents the University of Missouri;
(b) Two members who represent the private health care research industry and
who have expertise in pediatric diseases;
(c) Two members who represent the private research industry and who have
expertise in pediatric diseases;
(d) One member representing a collaborating nonprofit or industry partner; and
(e) One member representing a patient advocacy group.
4. Beginning January 1, 2027, the task force shall meet at least quarterly. The
department of higher education and workforce development shall provide necessary
clerical support and assistance in order to facilitate meetings of the task force.
5. The task force shall submit an annual public report to the governor and the
general assembly no later than December thirty-first of each year detailing:
(1) Research initiatives focused on genetic or pediatric diseases, including rare
pediatric diseases, led by institutions located in this state;
(2) Key outcomes achieved by the research initiatives;
(3) Funds expended and leveraged by the research initiatives; and
(4) Any legislative recommendations.
6. This section shall expire on December 31, 2030.
✔